src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! Udmurt verb inflection
!!
!! Udmurt verbs are mainly split into two types: 
!!  * conjugation I, whose stems mostly end on *ы* (ex. *мыны-ны* 'go', *юы-ны* 'drink', *вераськы-ны* 'speak')
!!  * conjugation II, whose stems mostly end on *а/я* (ex. *ужа.ны* 'work', *келя.ны* 'send, put', *кырӟа.ны* 'sing')

!! Conjugation I verbs also may have a 'short' stem, which subtracts the final
!! *ы*. The rule is not necessarily as simple as suffixes that begin on
!! consonants require a vowel-ending stem, because there are some exceptions.
!! Following is a list of things that use the short stem (so far
!! incomplete, but feel free to add to it)
!!
!!  * All forms of the *present affirmative*
!!  * All forms of the *present negative*
!!  * All forms of the *future affirmative*
!!  * All forms of the *future negative*
!!  * Preterite II Negative? 
!!  * Caritive gerund? 
!!  
!! And the long stem:
!!
!!  * Infinitive
!!  * Conditional affirmative, negative
!!  * basic gerund, temporal gerund, fourth gerund ?
!!  * gerunds: instrumental -(э)мен/-(е)мен, elative -(э)мысь/-(е)мысь ?

!! There are some orthographic things to consider, and they show up in the way
!! verbs are inflected. The palatizing series [[d z l n s t] is represented 
!! in two ways: vowel letters following, or by the palatizing symbol. 

!!      возьыны    ..   возе    ..   возисько
!!      бертыны    ..   бертэ   ..   бертӥсько

LEXICON V_ !!= @CODE@ Verb type is still to be determined.
+WORK+V: #;

LEXICON V-NEG_
уг+V+Neg+Prs+Sg1:уг K ;
уг+V+Neg+Prs+Sg2:уд K ;
уг+V+Neg+Prs+Sg3:уг K ;
уг+V+Neg+Prs+Pl1:ум K ;
уг+V+Neg+Prs+Pl2:уд K ;
уг+V+Neg+Prs+Pl3:уг K ;
уг+V+Neg+Fut+Sg1:уг K ;
уг+V+Neg+Fut+Sg2:уд K ;
уг+V+Neg+Fut+Sg3:уз K ;
уг+V+Neg+Fut+Pl1:ум K ;
уг+V+Neg+Fut+Pl2:уд K ;
уг+V+Neg+Fut+Pl3:уз K ;

уг+V+Neg+Prs+Sg1:ӧй K ;
уг+V+Neg+Prs+Sg2:ӧд K ;
уг+V+Neg+Prs+Sg3:ӧз K ;
уг+V+Neg+Prs+Pl1:ӧм K ;
уг+V+Neg+Prs+Pl2:ӧд K ;
уг+V+Neg+Prs+Pl3:ӧз K ;

уг+V+Neg+Imprt+Sg2:эн K ;
уг+V+Neg+Imprt+Pl2:эн K ;
!CHECKME 2019-11-07
ӧвӧл+V+Neg+Sg:ӧвӧл K ;


!! Typical V_MONO entry is the long stem, ending on <ы>
!!  берты, возьы

!!  бертыны:берт V_MONO  "mennä kotiin" ;

LEXICON V_MONO
!! Lexicon **@LEXNAME@** мыныны:мыны
!! * Yaml: **mynyny** , This is first declension
! Testing JASKA
+Ind+PrtI+ConNeg+Pl:%>%^Е2 K ;
+Ind+PrtII+Neg+Pl2:%>%^И2ллямтэды K ;
+PrcPrfNeg:%>%^Е2мтэе K ;
 V_МЫНЫНЫ ;
+Ind+Fut:%>%^О2 FUT-PERSON ;
+Ind+Fut+Pl1:%>%^О2%>мы K ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>%^О2 K ;
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Pl3:%>%^О2 K ;
+Opt+Sg1:%>%^О2м K ;
+Opt+Sg2:%>%^О2д K ;
+Opt+Sg3:%>%^О2з K ;
+Opt+Pl1:%>%^О2мы K	;
+Opt+Pl2:%>%^О2ды K	;
+Opt+Pl3:%>%^О2зы K	;
+Der/Он:%>%^О2н  N_	;
+Der/Он+N+Der/тэм:%>%^О2н%>тэм  A_	;
+Der/Оно:%>%^О2но  A_	;

LEXICON V-WITH-KARON
!! words that do not occur alone
!! Russian verbs are often followed by the Udmurt карыны OR карон
+Pcle+OLang/RUS+RusV: # ;

LEXICON V_UZA
!! Lexicon **@LEXNAME@**
!! * Yaml: **uzhany** , this is second declension
! testing JASKA
+Ind+PrtI+ConNeg+Pl:%>лэ K ;
+Ind+PrtII+Neg+Pl2:%>мтэды K ;
+PrcPrfNeg:%>%^Е2мтэ K ;
 V_МЫНЫНЫ ;
+Ind+Fut:%>%^Л3%^О2 FUT-PERSON ;
+Ind+Fut+Pl1:%>%^Л3%^О2%>мы K ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>%^Л3%^О2 K ;
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Pl3:%>%^Л3%^О2 K ;
+Opt+Sg1:%>%^Л3%^О2м K ;
+Opt+Sg2:%>%^Л3%^О2д K ;
+Opt+Sg3:%>%^Л3%^О2з K ;
+Opt+Pl1:%>%^Л3%^О2мы K	;
+Opt+Pl2:%>%^Л3%^О2ды K	;
+Opt+Pl3:%>%^Л3%^О2зы K	;
+Der/Он:%>%^Л3%^О2н  N_	;
+Der/Он+N+Der/тэм:%>%^Л3%^О2н%>тэм  A_	;
+Der/Оно:%>%^Л3%^О2но  A_	;


!! Mutual à la Jaska
LEXICON V_МЫНЫНЫ !! мыныны:мыны
!! Lexicon **@LEXNAME@**
!! * Yaml: **mynyny** 

+Ind+Prs: APRS ;
+Ind+Fut+ConNeg+Sg:%^ЫLoss K ;
+Ind+Fut+ConNeg+Pl:%>%^Е2 K ;
+Ind+Fut+ConNeg+Pl:%>%^Е2лэ K ;
+Ind+PrtI:  PRTI-PERSON ;
+Ind+PrtI+ConNeg+Sg:%^ЫLoss K ;
+Ind+PrtII: PRTII-PERSON ;
+Cond:%>сал COND ;
+Imprt: IMPRT ;
+Imprt+Pl2:%>%^Е2 K	;!Is this only мыныны
+Opt: OPT ;
: NONFINITES ;


LEXICON APRS
!! Lexicon **@LEXNAME@**
+Sg1:%>%^И2сько K ;
+Sg2:%>%^И2ськод K ;
+Sg3:%>%^Е2 K ;
+Pl1:%>%^И2ськом K ;
+Pl1:%>%^И2ськомы K ;
+Pl2:%>%^И2ськоды K ;
+ConNeg+Sg1:%>%^И2ськы K ;
+ConNeg+Sg2:%>%^И2ськы K ;
+ConNeg+Sg3:%^ЫLossVar K ;
+ConNeg+Pl1:%>%^И2ське K ;
+ConNeg+Pl2:%>%^И2ське K ;

LEXICON FUT-PERSON
!! Lexicon **@LEXNAME@**
+Sg1: K ;
+Sg2:%>д K ;
+Sg3:%>з K ;
+Pl1:%>м K ;
+Pl2:%>ды K ;
+Pl3:%>зы K ;

LEXICON PRTI-PERSON
!! Lexicon **@LEXNAME@**
+Sg1:%>%^И2 K ;
+Sg2:%>%^И2д K ;
+Sg3:%>%^И2з K ;
+Pl1:%>%^И2мы K ;
+Pl1:%>%^И2м K ;
+Pl2:%>%^И2ды K ;
+Pl3:%>%^И2зы K ;

LEXICON PRTII-PERSON
!! Lexicon **@LEXNAME@**
+Sg1:%>%^И2ськем K ;
+Sg2:%>%^Е2мед K ;
+Sg3:%>%^Е2м K ;
+Pl1:%>%^И2ськеммы K ;
+Pl2:%>%^И2ллямды K ;
+Pl3:%>%^И2ллямзы K ;
+Pl3:%>%^И2ллям K ;
+ConNeg+Sg1:%>%^И2ськем K ;
+ConNeg+Sg2:%>%^Е2мед K ;
+ConNeg+Sg3:%>%^Е2м K ;
+ConNeg+Pl1:%>%^И2ськеммы K ;
+ConNeg+Pl2:%>%^И2ллямды K ;
+ConNeg+Pl3:%>%^И2ллямзы K ;
+ConNeg+Pl3:%>%^И2ллям K ;

+Neg+Sg1:%>%^И2ськымтэе K ;
+Neg+Sg2:%>мтэед K ;
+Neg+Sg3:%>мтэ K ;
+Neg+Pl1:%>%^И2ськымтэмы K ;
+Neg+Pl3:%>%^И2ллямтэзы K ;
+Neg+Pl3:%>%^И2ллямтэ K ;


LEXICON COND
!! Lexicon **@LEXNAME@**
+Sg1:          K ;
+Sg2:          K ;
+Sg2:ыд        K ;
+Sg3:          K ;
+Sg3:ыз       K ;
+Pl1:мы        K ;
+Pl2:ды        K ;
+Pl3:зы        K ;
+ConNeg+Sg1:   K ;
+ConNeg+Sg2:   K ;
+ConNeg+Sg2:ыд K ;
+ConNeg+Sg3:   K ;
+ConNeg+Sg3:ыз K ;
+ConNeg+Pl1:мы K ;
+ConNeg+Pl2:ды K ;
+ConNeg+Pl3:зы K ;

LEXICON IMPRT
!! Lexicon **@LEXNAME@**
+Sg2:%^ЫLoss K	   ;
!+Sg3:%>%^О2з K	; Kozmács István 2014-05-27 => Opt
+Pl2:%>%^Е2лэ K	;
!+Pl3:%>%^О2зы K	; Kozmács István 2014-05-27 => Opt
+ConNeg+Sg2:%^ЫLoss K	;
+ConNeg+Pl2:%>%^Е2 K	; !мыныны
+ConNeg+Pl2:%>%^Е2лэ K	;
!+ConNeg+Pl3:%>%^Е2 K	; !мыныны Kozmács István 2014-05-27 => Opt
!+ConNeg+Pl3:%>%^Е2лэ K	; Kozmács István 2014-05-27 => Opt

LEXICON OPT
!! Lexicon **@LEXNAME@**
+ConNeg+Sg:%^ЫLoss K ;
+ConNeg+Sg3:%^ЫLossVar K	;
+ConNeg+Pl:%>%^Е2 K ;
+ConNeg+Pl:%>%^Е2лэ K	;

LEXICON NONFINITES
    !! Lexicon **@LEXNAME@**
+Inf:ны  K	;
+GerPos:%>са  K	;
+GerNeg:%>тэк  K	;
+Der/тозь+GerTer:%>тозь  K	;
+Der/ку+GerTemp:%>ку  K	;
+PrcPrs+N+Der/тэм:%>%^И2сьтэм A_ ;
+PrcPrsNeg:%>%^И2сьтэм K ;
+PrcPrsPos:%>%^И2сь K ;
!2019-06-03+PrcPrfAdn:%>%^Е2м K ;
+Der/Эм+PrcPrfAdn:%>%^Е2м N_ ;
+PrcPrfPred:%>%^Е2мын K ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
